Georgia statutes. TITLE 21 Elections
Article 1 General Provisions
21-2-5.
Qualifications of candidates for federal and state office; determination of qualifications.

Every candidate for federal and state office who is certified by the state executive committee of a political party or who files a notice of candidacy shall meet the constitutional and statutory qualifications for holding the office being sought.

The Secretary of State upon his or her own motion may challenge the qualifications of any candidate at any time prior to the election of such candidate. Within two weeks after the deadline for qualifying, any elector who is eligible to vote for a candidate may challenge the qualifications of the candidate by filing a written complaint with the Secretary of State giving the reasons why the elector believes the candidate is not qualified to seek and hold the public office for which he or she is offering. Upon his or her own motion or upon a challenge being filed, the Secretary of State shall notify the candidate in writing that his or her qualifications are being challenged and the reasons therefor and shall advise the candidate that he or she is requesting a hearing on the matter before an administrative law judge of the Office of State Administrative Hearings pursuant to Article 2 of Chapter 13 of Title 50 and shall inform the candidate of the date, time, and place of the hearing when such information becomes available. The administrative law judge shall report his or her findings to the Secretary of State.

The Secretary of State shall determine if the candidate is qualified to seek and hold the public office for which such candidate is offering. If the Secretary of State determines that the candidate is not qualified, the Secretary of State shall withhold the name of the candidate from the ballot or strike such candidate’s name from the ballot if the ballots have been printed. If there is insufficient time to strike the candidate’s name or reprint the ballots, a prominent notice shall be placed at each affected polling place advising voters of the disqualification of the candidate and all votes cast for such candidate shall be void and shall not be counted.

In the event that a candidate pays his or her qualifying fee with a check that is subsequently returned for insufficient funds, the Secretary of State shall automatically find that such candidate has not met the qualifications for holding the office being sought, unless the bank, credit union, or other financial institution returning the check certifies in writing by an officer’s or director’s oath that the bank, credit union, or financial institution erred in returning the check.

The elector filing the challenge or the candidate challenged shall have the right to appeal the decision of the Secretary of State by filing a petition in the Superior Court of Fulton County within ten days after the entry of the final decision by the Secretary of State. The filing of the petition shall not itself stay the decision of the Secretary of State; however, the reviewing court may order a stay upon appropriate terms for good cause shown. As soon as possible after service of the petition, the Secretary of State shall transmit the original or a certified copy of the entire record of the proceedings under review to the reviewing court. The review shall be conducted by the court without a jury and shall be confined to the record. The court shall not substitute its judgment for that of the Secretary of State as to the weight of the evidence on questions of fact. The court may affirm the decision or remand the case for further proceedings. The court may reverse or modify the decision if substantial rights of the appellant have been prejudiced because the findings, inferences, conclusions, or decisions of the Secretary of State are:

In violation of the Constitution or laws of this state;

In excess of the statutory authority of the Secretary of State;

Made upon unlawful procedures;

Affected by other error of law;

Clearly erroneous in view of the reliable, probative, and substantial evidence on the whole record; or

Arbitrary or capricious or characterized by an abuse of discretion or a clearly unwarranted exercise of discretion.

An aggrieved party may obtain a review of any final judgment of the superior court by the Court of Appeals or the Supreme Court, as provided by law.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-304, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 312, § 1; Ga. L. 1983, p. 884, § 6-1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 636, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 496, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 32, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 1360, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 900, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 617, § 1; Ga. L. 1997, p. 590, § 2; Ga. L. 1998, p. 145, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 21, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 52, § 1.

Cross references.

Persons not eligible to hold office, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. II, Sec. II, Para. III.

Restriction on eligibility of commissioner of transportation for state or federal elective office, §

32-2-40

.

Eligibility of commissioner of veterans service for state or federal elective office, §

38-4-6

.

Eligibility and qualifications of persons for public office generally, T. 45, C. 2.

Qualification of candidates for office; time period during which bank, credit union, or other financial institution may certify error in returning check, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Election Code, Nomination of Candidates, § 183-1-10-.01.

21-2-6.
Qualifications of candidates for county and municipal office; determination of qualifications.

Every candidate for county office who is certified by the county executive committee of a political party or who files a notice of candidacy, and every candidate for municipal office who is certified by a municipal executive committee of a political party or who files a notice of candidacy, shall meet the constitutional and statutory qualifications for holding the office being sought.

The superintendent upon his or her own motion may challenge the qualifications of any candidate referred to in subsection (a) of this Code section at any time prior to the election of such candidate. Within two weeks after the deadline for qualifying, any elector who is eligible to vote for any such candidate may challenge the qualifications of the candidate by filing a written complaint with the superintendent giving the reasons why the elector believes the candidate is not qualified to seek and hold the public office for which the candidate is offering. Upon his or her own motion or upon a challenge being filed, the superintendent shall notify the candidate in writing that his or her qualifications are being challenged and the reasons therefor and shall advise the candidate that he or she is setting a hearing on the matter and shall inform the candidate of the date, time, and place of the hearing.

The superintendent shall determine if the candidate is qualified to seek and hold the public office for which such candidate is offering. If the superintendent determines that the candidate is not qualified, the superintendent shall withhold the name of the candidate from the ballot or strike such candidate’s name from the ballot if the ballots have been printed. If there is insufficient time to strike the candidate’s name or reprint the ballots, a prominent notice shall be placed at each affected polling place advising voters of the disqualification of the candidate and all votes cast for such candidate shall be void and shall not be counted.

In the event that a candidate pays his or her qualifying fee with a check that is subsequently returned for insufficient funds, the superintendent shall automatically find that such candidate has not met the qualifications for holding the office being sought, unless the bank, credit union, or other financial institution returning the check certifies in writing by an officer’s or director’s oath that the bank, credit union, or financial institution erred in returning the check.

The elector filing the challenge or the candidate challenged shall have the right to appeal the decision of the superintendent by filing a petition in the superior court of the county in which the candidate resides within ten days after the entry of the final decision by the superintendent. The filing of the petition shall not itself stay the decision of the superintendent; however, the reviewing court may order a stay upon appropriate terms for good cause shown. As soon as possible after service of the petition, the superintendent shall transmit the original or a certified copy of the entire record of the proceedings under review to the reviewing court. The review shall be conducted by the court without a jury and shall be confined to the record. The court shall not substitute its judgment for that of the superintendent as to the weight of the evidence on questions of fact. The court may affirm the decision or remand the case for further proceedings. The court may reverse or modify the decision if substantial rights of the appellant have been prejudiced because the findings, inferences, conclusions, or decisions of the superintendent are:

In violation of the Constitution or laws of this state;

In excess of the statutory authority of the superintendent;

Made upon unlawful procedures;

Affected by other error of law;

Clearly erroneous in view of the reliable, probative, and substantial evidence on the whole record; or

Arbitrary or capricious or characterized by an abuse of discretion or a clearly unwarranted exercise of discretion.

An aggrieved party may obtain a review of any final judgment of the superior court by the Court of Appeals or the Supreme Court, as provided by law.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-406, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 312, § 2; Ga. L. 1983, p. 884, § 6-3; Ga. L. 1986, p. 32, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 1360, § 2; Ga. L. 1989, p. 900, § 2; Ga. L. 1993, p. 617, § 2; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 230, § 1.

Cross references.

Persons not eligible to hold office, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. II, Sec. II, Para. III.

County officers, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. IX, Sec. I, Para. III.

Appointment of county school superintendents, §

20-2-101

.

Eligibility and qualifications of persons for public office generally, T. 45, C. 2.

Qualification of candidates for office; time period during which bank, credit union, or other financial institution may certify error in returning check, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Election Code, Nomination of Candidates, § 183-1-10-.01.

Law reviews.

For note on the 2001 amendment to this Code section, see 18 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 114 (2001).

For article, “Local Government Law,” see 53 Mercer L. Rev. 389 (2001).

21-2-7.
Eligibility of subversive persons for nomination or election to public office.

No person who has been adjudged a “subversive person,” as defined in Part 2 of Article 1 of Chapter 11 of Title 16, the “Sedition and Subversive Activities Act of 1953,” shall be nominated or elected in accordance with this chapter.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-106, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1.

Cross references.

Persons not eligible to hold office, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. II, Sec. II, Para. III.

Ineligibility of subversive persons to hold office or position in government, §

16-11-12

.

Eligibility and qualifications of persons for public office generally, T. 45, C. 2.

Loyalty oath for state officers and employees, § 45-3-11 et seq.

21-2-8.
Eligibility for party nomination, public office, or performance of certain official acts of persons convicted and sentenced for certain crimes; illegally holding any public funds; effect of disqualification of superintendent.

No person shall be eligible for party nomination for or election to public office, nor shall he or she perform any official acts or duties as a superintendent, registrar, deputy registrar, poll officer, or party officer, as set forth in this chapter, in connection with any election or primary held under this chapter, if under the laws of this state, any other state, or the United States he or she has been convicted and sentenced, in any court of competent jurisdiction, for fraudulent violation of primary or election laws, malfeasance in office, or felony involving moral turpitude, unless such person’s civil rights have been restored and at least ten years have elapsed from the date of the completion of the sentence without a subsequent conviction of another felony involving moral turpitude. Additionally, the person shall not be holding illegally any public funds. In the event of the disqualification of the superintendent as described in this Code section, the clerk of the superior court shall act in his or her stead. Notwithstanding the above, the governing authority of a municipality shall appoint an individual to serve as superintendent for municipal elections or municipal primaries in the event of the disqualification of the municipal superintendent, unless the municipality has contracted with a county government for the provision of election services, in which event the clerk of the superior court shall act in place of a disqualified superintendent.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-107, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1983, p. 930, § 2; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 240, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 253, § 3/HB 244.

Cross references.

Persons not eligible to hold office, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. II, Sec. II, Para. III.

Eligibility and qualifications of persons for public office generally, T. 45, C. 2.

Vacating of state office upon conviction of officer for felony, § 45-5-2 and Ga. Const. 1983, Art. II, Sec. III.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1983, p. 930, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provided: “It is the intent of this Act to implement certain changes required by Article II, Section I, Paragraph III and Article II, Section II, Paragraph III of the Constitution of the State of Georgia.”

21-2-9.
Date of election for offices.

The Governor, Lieutenant Governor, Secretary of State, Attorney General, State School Superintendent, Commissioner of Insurance, Commissioner of Agriculture, Commissioner of Labor, members of Congress, district attorneys, members of the General Assembly, and county officers not elected pursuant to Code Section 21-2-139 shall be elected in the November election next preceding the expiration of the term of office.

Justices of the Supreme Court, Judges of the Court of Appeals, judges of the superior courts, and county judicial officers, offices of local school boards, and nonpartisan offices elected pursuant to Code Section 21-2-139 shall be elected in the nonpartisan general election next preceding the expiration of the term of office.

All general municipal elections to fill municipal offices shall be held on the Tuesday next following the first Monday in November in each odd-numbered year. Public notice of such elections shall be published by the governing authority of the municipality in a newspaper of general circulation in the municipality at least 30 days prior to the elections. In addition, the municipality shall immediately transmit a copy of such notice to the Secretary of State.

Whenever a municipal general primary or election is held in conjunction with the general primary or November general election in even-numbered years, the time specified for the closing of the registration list, the time within which candidates must qualify for the municipal primary or election, and the time specified for the holding of any runoff necessary shall be the same as specified for general elections.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, §§ 1245, 1265, 1266, 1267, 1268, 1270, 1274; Code 1868, §§ 1326, 1346, 1347, 1348, 1349, 1351, 1355; Ga. L. 1869, p. 22, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1872, p. 29, § 2; Ga. L. 1872, p. 80, § 8; Code 1873, §§ 1305, 1319, 1320, 1321, 1323, 1327; Code 1882, §§ 1305, 1319, 1320, 1321, 1323, 1327; Ga. L. 1894, p. 40, § 1; Civil Code 1895, §§ 83, 97, 98, 99, 101, 105; Ga. L. 1898, p. 42, § 1; Ga. L. 1898, p. 43, § 1; Civil Code 1910, §§ 97, 111, 112, 113, 115, 119; Ga. L. 1913, p. 135, § 1; Ga. L. 1914, p. 47, § 1; Code 1933, §§ 34-2302, 34-2401, 34-2602, 34-2603, 34-2701, 34-2705; Ga. L. 1957, p. 102, § 1; Ga. L. 1957, p. 117, § 1; Code 1933, § 34-802, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 1004, § 15; Ga. L. 1983, p. 884, § 6-3; Ga. L. 1986, p. 855, § 3; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 253, § 4/HB 244; Ga. L. 2008, p. 817, § 1/HB 1098; Ga. L. 2012, p. 995, § 1/SB 92.

Law reviews.

For article, “Elections:
Elections and Primaries Through the Pandemic,” see 37 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 241 (2020).

For note, “The Case of the Vanishing Supreme Court Contest:

Barrow v. Raffensperger

Eliminates the Power of the People to Elect their Appellate, Superior, and State Court Judges,” see 72 Mercer L. Rev. 957 (2021).

21-2-10.
Election of presidential electors.

At the November election to be held in the year 1964 and every fourth year thereafter, there shall be elected by the electors of this state persons to be known as electors of President and Vice President of the United States and referred to in this chapter as presidential electors, equal in number to the whole number of senators and representatives to which this state may be entitled in the Congress of the United States.

History.

Laws 1824, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 235; Code 1863, § 1251; Code 1868, § 1332; Code 1873, § 1311; Code 1882, § 1311; Civil Code 1895, § 89; Civil Code 1910, § 103; Code 1933, § 34-2501; Ga. L. 1958, p. 208, §§ 1, 3; Code 1933, § 34-1601, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 21; Ga. L. 1993, p. 118, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1.

21-2-11.
Performance of duties by presidential electors.

The presidential electors chosen pursuant to Code Section 21-2-10 shall assemble at the seat of government of this state at 12:00 Noon of the day which is, or may be, directed by the Congress of the United States and shall then and there perform the duties required of them by the Constitution and laws of the United States.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 1252; Code 1868, § 1333; Code 1873, § 1312; Ga. L. 1880-81, p. 67, § 1; Code 1882, § 1312; Ga. L. 1888, p. 33, § 1; Civil Code 1895, § 90; Civil Code 1910, § 104; Code 1933, § 34-2502; Code 1933, § 34-1602, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1.

Law reviews.

For survey article on zoning and land use law, see 60 Mercer L. Rev. 457 (2008).

21-2-12.
Procedure for filling presidential elector vacancies.

If any such presidential elector shall die, or for any cause fail to attend at the seat of government at the time appointed by law, the presidential electors present shall proceed to choose by voice vote a person of the same political party or body, if any, as such deceased or absent presidential elector, to fill the vacancy occasioned thereby; and immediately after such choice the name of the person so chosen shall be transmitted by the presiding officer of the college to the Governor, who shall immediately cause notice of his or her election in writing to be given to such person. The person so elected, and not the person in whose place he or she shall have been chosen, shall be a presidential elector and shall, with the other presidential electors, perform the duties required of them by the Constitution and laws of the United States.

History.

Laws 1824, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 240; Code 1863, § 1253; Code 1868, § 1334; Code 1873, § 1313; Code 1882, § 1313; Civil Code 1895, § 91; Civil Code 1910, § 105; Code 1933, § 34-2503; Code 1933, § 34-1603, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1.

21-2-13.
Compensation of presidential electors; payment of expenses of electoral college.

Each presidential elector shall receive from the state treasury the sum of $50.00 for every day spent in traveling to, remaining at, and returning from the place of meeting and shall be entitled to mileage at the rate of 10¢ per mile to and from his or her home. The reasonable expenses of the electoral college shall likewise be paid by the state treasurer, in both cases upon warrants drawn by the presiding officer of the college.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 1257; Code 1868, § 1338; Code 1873, § 1317; Code 1882, § 1317; Ga. L. 1882-83, p. 54, § 1; Civil Code 1895, § 95; Civil Code 1910, § 109; Code 1933, § 34-2507; Code 1933, § 34-1604, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1402, § 18; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 2010, p. 863, § 3/SB 296.

21-2-14.
Computation of time as to exercise of privilege or discharge of duty under chapter.

Unless otherwise stated in a specific Code section of this chapter, time periods under this chapter include Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays. When the last day for the exercise of any privilege or the discharge of any duty prescribed or required by this chapter shall fall on a Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday, the next succeeding business day shall be the last day for the exercise of such privilege or the discharge of such duty.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-105, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1969, p. 329, § 1; Ga. L. 1997, p. 590, § 3; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 52, § 2.

Cross references.

Computation of time generally, §§

1-3-1

,

9-11-6

.

21-2-15.
Applicability of chapter.

This chapter shall apply to any general or special election in this state to fill any federal, state, county, or municipal office, to any general or special primary to nominate candidates for any such office, and to any federal, state, county, or municipal election or primary for any other purpose whatsoever, unless otherwise provided.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-102, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1.

21-2-16.
Construction of chapter.

The provisions of this chapter, so far as they are the same as those of existing laws, are intended as a continuation of such laws and not as new enactments. Unless otherwise provided in this chapter, this chapter shall repeal any conflicting provision or provisions of any municipal act in conflict with this chapter. The repeal by this chapter of any Act of the General Assembly or any municipal corporation, or part thereof, shall not revive any Act, or part thereof, heretofore repealed or superseded. This chapter shall not affect any act done, liability or penalty incurred, right accrued or vested, or nomination made prior to the taking effect of this chapter; nor shall they affect any action or prosecution then pending or to be instituted, to enforce any right or penalty then accrued or to punish any offense theretofore committed.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-104, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1.

21-2-17.
Designation of candidate’s chief deputy clerk in elections for clerk of state court of certain counties.

This Code section shall apply only to counties with a population of 425,000 or more according to the United States decennial census of 1990 or any future such census.

When a candidate for election to clerk of the state court of a county is required by law at any time before election to name the person whom such candidate will appoint as chief deputy if elected to office, the ballot for office shall include, below the name of the candidate, the name of each candidate’s designated chief deputy, labeled as such.

This Code section shall not be construed to require any action to fill a vacancy in the position of chief deputy of clerk of the state court of a county.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-2-17

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2590, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1.